Hawaii statutes.
§281-82 No action for debt. No person
except a licensed manufacturer or licensed wholesale or retail dealer or his
heirs, personal representatives, trustees, or assigns with respect to sales
regularly made under his license shall recover by any process of law any debt
or demand on account of the sale on credit of any liquor, nor on any note or
like obligation given in payment for liquor. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §52; RL 1935,
§2621; RL 1945, §7270; RL 1955, §159-81; HRS §281-82; am L 1976, c 200, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next